Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-111
Department of Health and Human Services; estimated appropriation; suggested improvements.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall prepare an estimate of the appropriations necessary for the support and needed improvements of the institutions under its charge, and a report of their operation during the preceding biennium, for the use of the Legislature. The estimate shall be printed and may include a report of the results of investigation of methods of institution management and of treatment of patients and inmates, with suggestions for the betterment of any or all conditions.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 17, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 7195;

C.S.1922, § 6846;

C.S.1929, § 83-117;

R.S.1943, § 83-111;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 900.